Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.430

Commission merchant's remittance to consignor.

Every commission merchant shall remit to the consignor of any agricultural product the full price for which such agricultural product was sold within thirty days of the date of sale, or in the case of livestock within seven days of the date of sale unless otherwise mutually agreed between grower and commission merchant. The remittance to the consignor shall include all collections, overcharges, and damages, less the agreed commission and other charges and advances, and a complete account of the sale. Where payment for livestock is made by mail, payment is timely if mailed within seven days of the date of sale unless otherwise specified in an agreement between the producer and the dealer in livestock.

[ 1982 c 20 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 304 s 11; 1974 ex.s. c 102 s 9; 1959 c 139 s 43.]